src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun
laa'in+Pro+1SN:laa'in # ; !I/yo
laa'at+Pro+2SN:laa'at # ; !you/tu
laa'ex+Pro+2PL:laa'ex # ; !you/ustedes
laa'o+Pro+1PL:laa'o # ; !we/nosotros
a'an+Pro+3SN:a'an # ; !pronombre de tercera person singular
chixjunil+Pro:chixjunil #; !everything/todo
maak'a'+Pro:maak'a' #; !nothing/nada
junaq+Pro:junaq #; !some/algunos
